Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2521
Elections; when held; city clerk; duties.

Elections under the Municipal Initiative and Referendum Act, either at a special election or regularly scheduled primary or general election, shall be called by the city clerk. Any special election to be conducted by the election commissioner or county clerk shall be subject to section 32-405.

The city clerk shall cause notice of every such election to be printed in one or more legal newspapers in or of general circulation in such municipality at least once not less than thirty days prior to such election and also posted in the office of the city clerk and in at least three conspicuous places in such municipality at least thirty days prior to such election.

The city clerk shall make available for photocopying a copy in pamphlet form of measures initiated or referred. Such notice provided in this section shall designate where such a copy in pamphlet form may be obtained.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 21;

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 13;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 502;

Laws 2003, LB 521, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 173.